Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4297.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 13a. (1) An employer shall not do any of the following: (a) Require as a condition of employment nondisclosure by an employee of his or her the employee's wages. (b) Require an employee to sign a waiver or other document which that purports to deny an employee the right to disclose his or her the employee's wages. (c) Discharge, formally discipline, or otherwise discriminate against for job advancement an employee who discloses his or her the employee's wages. (d) Fail to provide an employee with wage information for similarly situated employees that covers a period of not more than 3 years before the date of the request. The employer must provide the requested wage information not later than 30 days after the employee's request. The employer may redact the names of similarly situated employees, but shall provide information about the sex and seniority of similarly situated employees for whom wage information is provided. As used in this subdivision: (i) "Similarly situated employees" means employees who are within the same job classification as the employee who requests the information or whose duties are comparable in skill, effort, responsibility, working conditions, and training to those of the employee who requests the information. (ii) "Wage information" includes salary and hourly wage information as well as information about bonus pay, overtime pay, and other forms of compensation provided by the employer. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.